Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.070

Industry representative member of the commission—Appointment.

(1) The director shall appoint the industry representative members of the commission.

(2) Not later than November 1st preceding the expiration of an industry representative member's term of office, the commission shall, by majority vote of a quorum of the commission, select a qualified candidate for the industry representative position and forward the name of the candidate to the director.

(3) The director may select the candidate for the position or may reject the candidate and request that the commission forward the name of an additional candidate for appointment consideration by the director.

(4) Except for good cause shown, appointments under this section must be made no later than fifteen days before the commencement of the term of office of the position for which the appointment is made.

[ 2009 c 33 s 7.]